Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.421

Administrator.

The administrator shall have responsibility for performance of all the powers, duties, and functions of the department except those specifically assigned to the board. In the performance of these powers, duties, and functions, the administrator shall conform to policies established by the board, and may employ and fix the compensation of such personnel as may be required to perform the duties of this office.

[ 2003 c 334 s 114; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.160. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 16. Formerly RCW 43.30.160.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.